Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,132
Definitions, sections found.

As used in sections 81-5,132 to 81-5,146, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 81-5,133 to 81-5,139 shall apply.

Laws 1981, LB 296, § 1.